da: Bagsidestype: Enkelte rhinsten; Blandet; Færdigt motiv; Rulle; Ark (gitter); Strimmel/kant; Andet
zh-TW: 背襯類型: 獨立水鑽; 混合; 預先排列圖案; 捲狀; 片狀 (網格); 條狀/飾邊; 其他
zh-CN: 背胶类型: 独立水钻; 混合; 预排图案; 卷筒式; 片状（网格）; 条状/饰边; 其他
ja: バックタイプ: 個別のラインストーン; ミックス; 既製モチーフ; ロール; シート (グリッド); ストリップ/トリム; その他
sv: Typ av baksida: Lösa strass-stenar; Blandat; Färdigt motiv; Rulle; Ark (rutnät); Remsa/kantband; Övrigt
fr: Type de support: Strass individuels; Mixte; Motif pré-assemblé; Rouleau; Feuille (grille); Bande/bordure; Autre
th: ประเภทการยึดติด: คริสตัลไรน์สโตนแยกเม็ด; ผสม; ลวดลายจัดเรียงล่วงหน้า; ม้วน; แผ่น (กริด); เส้น/แถบตกแต่ง; อื่นๆ
tr: Arka yüzey türü: Tekli yapay elmas; Karma; Önceden düzenlenmiş motif; Rulo; Levha (ızgara); Şerit/kenar süsü; Diğer
hu: Hátoldal típusa: Egyedi strasszok; Kevert; Előre elrendezett motívum; Tekercs; Ív (rácsos); Szalag/szegély; Egyéb
nb: Type baksidemateriale: Individuelle rhinsteiner; Blandet; Forhåndsarrangert motiv; Rull; Ark (rutenett); Strimmel/kantebånd; Annet
ro-RO: Tip de căptușeală: Strasuri individuale; Mixt; Motiv prestabilit; Rolă; Foaie (grilă); Bandă/Bordură; Altele
pt-BR: Tipo de suporte: Strass individuais; Misto; Motivo pré-montado; Rolo; Folha (grade); Tira/acabamento; Outro
sk-SK: Typ zadnej časti: Jednotlivé kamienky; Zmiešané; Vopred pripravený motív; Rolka; Plát (mriežka); Prúžok/pás; Iné
ko: 뒷면 유형: 개별 라인스톤; 혼합; 사전 배열된 모티프; 롤; 시트(그리드); 스트립/트림; 기타
lt-LT: Pagrindo tipas: Pavieniai kristalai; Mišrus; Iš anksto paruoštas motyvas; Ritinys; Lapas (tinklelis); Juostelė / apdaila; Kita
ru: Тип подложки: Отдельные стразы; Смешанный; Готовый мотив; Рулон; Лист (сетка); Полоса/тесьма; Другое
fi: Taustatyyppi: Yksittäiset tekojalokivet; Sekoitettu; Valmis kuvio; Rulla; Arkki (ruudukko); Nauha/reunus; Muu
hr-HR: Vrsta poleđine: Pojedinačni cirkoni; Miješano; Unaprijed složeni motiv; Rola; List (mreža); Traka / obrub; Ostalo
el: Τύπος υποστρώματος: Μεμονωμένα στρας; Μικτό; Προδιατεταγμένο μοτίβο; Ρολό; Φύλλο (πλέγμα); Λωρίδα/διακοσμητικό τελείωμα; Άλλο
nl: Type achterzijde: Individuele strasstenen; Gemengd; Vooraf gerangschikt motief; Rol; Vel (grid); Strip/rand; Overig
it: Tipo di supporto: Strass singoli; Misto; Motivo pre-disposto; Rotolo; Foglio (griglia); Striscia/passamaneria; Altro
cs: Typ podkladu: Jednotlivé kamínky; Smíšené; Předpřipravený motiv; Role; Arch (mřížka); Pruh/lem; Jiné
pt-PT: Tipo de fixação: Strass individual; Misto; Motivo pré-organizado; Rolo; Folha (grelha); Tira/fita; Outro
es: Tipo de respaldo: Diamantes de imitación individuales; Mixto; Motivo prearmado; Rollo; Lámina (cuadrícula); Tira/ribete; Otro
en: Backing type: Individual rhinestones; Mixed; Pre-arranged motif; Roll; Sheet (grid); Strip/trim; Other
pl: Typ podkładu: Pojedyncze kryształki; Mieszane; Gotowy motyw; Rolka; Arkusz (siatka); Pasek/taśma; Inne
de: Trägerart: Einzelne Strasssteine; Gemischt; Vorgefertigtes Motiv; Rolle; Bogen (Raster); Streifen/Borte; Sonstige
vi: Loại lớp lót mặt sau: Hạt đá đính lẻ; Hỗn hợp; Họa tiết xếp sẵn; Cuộn; Tấm (lưới); Dải/đường viền; Khác
sl-SI: Vrsta opore: Posamezni okrasni kamni; Mešano; Vnaprej pripravljen motiv; Rola; Pola (mreža); Trak/obroba; Drugo
bg-BG: Тип основа: Отделни кристали; Смесени; Предварително подреден мотив; Ролка; Лист (мрежа); Лента/кант; Друго